Indiana, session 2026, SB75.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-12-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Drive-through Facility Safety
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, a "drive-through facility" means
a drive-through financial institution, drive-through pharmacy, or
drive-through restaurant.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "drive-through financial
institution" means a financial institution that has one (1) or more
driving lanes on the exterior of its permanent building site that
allow a customer to conduct financial transactions from inside the
customer's motor vehicle rather than conducting those
transactions inside the building.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "drive-through pharmacy"
means a pharmacy that has one (1) or more driving lanes on the
exterior of its permanent building site that allow a customer to
drop off or pick up prescriptions while remaining inside the
2026 IN 75—LS 6117/DI 116


customer's motor vehicle rather than conducting those
transactions inside the building.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "drive-through restaurant"
means a food service operation or retail food establishment that
has one (1) or more driving lanes on the exterior of its permanent
building site that allow a customer to order, pay for, and pick up
food or beverages while remaining inside the customer's motor
vehicle rather than conducting those transactions inside the
building.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "financial institution" has the
meaning set forth in IC 28-1-1-3(1).
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "motor vehicle" has the meaning
set forth in IC 9-13-2-105(a).
Sec. 7. (a) This section applies after December 31, 2026.
(b) Except as provided in section 8 of this chapter:
(1) all new construction of a drive-through facility; or
(2) any business with a drive-through facility that undergoes
major renovations, expansion, or redevelopment to either its
permanent building or to its parking areas;
shall meet the minimum requirements specified in subsections (c)
and (d).
(c) The owner of a drive-through facility shall ensure that any
drive-through lane serving the facility's customers has an adjacent
bypass lane that allows for the following:
(1) The operator of a motor vehicle in the drive-through lane
to drive the motor vehicle out of the drive-through lane and
into the bypass lane in order to exit the property.
(2) The operator of a public safety vehicle to drive alongside
or close to any motor vehicle in the drive-through lane in
order to respond to an emergency related to an operator or
passenger of the motor vehicle.
(d) A bypass lane described in subsection (c) shall meet the
following minimum standards:
(1) Be not less than ten (10) feet wide without obstructions.
(2) Contain adequate vertical and horizontal clearance for
standard passenger vehicles and public safety vehicles.
(3) Include clear, visible signage to alert vehicle operators to
the presence and direction of the bypass lane.
(4) Be designed so as to not obstruct pedestrian pathways, fire
lanes, public safety vehicle access to the permanent building,
or accessible parking spaces or routes for persons with
disabilities.
2026 IN 75—LS 6117/DI 116


Sec. 8. (a) The requirements set forth in section 7 of this chapter
do not apply to the following:
(1) A drive-through facility built prior to January 1, 2027, to
which the following apply:
(A) There is insufficient space adjacent to the
drive-through lane to create a bypass lane on the property
on which the drive-through facility is located.
(B) Compliance with section 7 of this chapter would force
the owner of the drive-through facility to close or relocate
the business at which the drive-through facility is located.
(2) A drive-through facility where the drive-through lane
passes through the physical permanent structure.
(b) The commission shall review an order denying a person's
exemption under subsection (a) in accordance with IC 22-13-2-7 if
the person aggrieved by the applicable order petitions for review
under IC 4-21.5-3-7 within thirty (30) days after the issuance of the
order.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as an
exemption from the requirements of the Americans with
Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.).
Sec. 10. The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
necessary to implement this chapter.
2026 IN 75—LS 6117/DI 116